zh-CN: 工作容量: 重型; 轻型; 中型; 其他
hr-HR: Radni kapacitet: Za teške poslove; Za lake poslove; Za srednje teške poslove; Ostalo
zh-TW: 工作能力: 重工作; 輕工作; 中工作; 其他
lt-LT: Našumas: Didelės apkrovos; Lengvos apkrovos; Vidutinės apkrovos; Kita
pt-BR: Capacidade de trabalho: Resistente; Leve; Médio; Outro
it: Capacità di lavoro: Molto pesante; Molto leggero; Medio-leggero; Altro
en: Work capacity: Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Medium-duty; Other
sv: Tankkapacitet: Kraftig; Lättvikt; Medeltung; Övrigt
ja: 作業能力: ヘビーデューティ; ライトデューティ; ミディアムデューティ; その他
es: Capacidad de trabajo: Intensidad alta; Intensidad baja; Intensidad media; Otros
el: Ικανότητα εργασίας: Μεγάλης αντοχής; Ελαφράς αντοχής; Μεσαίας αντοχής; Άλλο
ru: Производительность: Тяжелый; Легкий; Средний; Другой
th: ความสามารถในการทำงาน: การใช้งานหนัก; การใช้งานเบา; การใช้งานปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
da: Arbejdskapacitet: Kraftig ydelse; Let ydelse; Medium ydelse; Andet
hu: Hasznos kapacitás: Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Közepes teherbírású; Egyéb
pl: Wytrzymałość robocza: Wytrzymały; Lekkie; Średnio wytrzymały; Inne
vi: Năng lực công việc: Hạng nặng; Hạng nhẹ; Hạng vừa; Khác
ko: 작업 능력: 헤비 듀티; 라이트 듀티; 미디엄 듀티; 기타
de: Arbeitskapazität: Schwerlast; Leichtlast; Mittellast; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Работен капацитет: Тежкотоварен; Лекотоварен; Среднотоварен; Други
fr: Capacité de travail: À toute épreuve; Travaux légers; Travaux moyens; Autre
sk-SK: Pracovná kapacita: Ťažký; Ľahký; Stredný; Iné
fi: Työkapasiteetti: Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Medium-duty; Muu
nl: Werkcapaciteit: Zwaar werk; Lichte taak; Middelzwaar; Andere
pt-PT: Capacidade de trabalho: Serviços pesados; Serviços leves; Peso médio; Outro
nb: Arbeidskapasitet: Tungt arbeid; Lett arbeid; Middels arbeid; Annet
sl-SI: Delovna zmogljivost: Močna; Lahka; Srednja; Drugo
ro-RO: Capacitate de lucru: Regim greu; Regim ușor; Regim rediu; Altele
cs: Pracovní kapacita: Náročné podmínky; Nenáročné podmínky; Středně náročné podmínky; Jiné
tr: Çalışma Kapasitesi: Ağır hizmet; Hafif hizmet; Orta hizmet; Diğer